Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2214
Separate account; accounting not reflected; when.

When annuity benefit payments have commenced and the amount of the annuity payments are not dependent upon investment experience then the accounting for the annuity cannot be reflected in or be a part of the separate account.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 14, p. 1265.